Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-581
Class I, II, or III school district; publication of claims and summary of proceedings; noncompliance by secretary; penalty.

The secretary of any school board or board of education of a Class I, II, or III school district failing or neglecting to comply with the provisions of section 79-580 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. In the discretion of the court, the judgment of conviction may provide for the removal from office of such secretary for such failure or neglect.

Laws 1947, c. 274, § 2, p. 879;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-604.02;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 198, p. 755;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 254;

R.S.Supp.,1980, § 79-514;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-703.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 334;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 17;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 50;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 57.
July 19, 2024